Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB316.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6131(a) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6131. Municipal permit denial.(a) Denial.--(1) A municipality or a board under subsection (c) may deny issuing to an applicant a municipal permit if the applicant owns real property in any municipality for which there exists on the real property:(i) a final and unappealable tax, water, sewer or refuse collection delinquency on account of the actions of the owner; [or](ii) a serious violation of State law or a code and 123456789101112131415161718 the owner has taken no substantial steps to correct the violation within six months following notification of the violation and for which fines or other penalties or a judgment to abate or correct were imposed by a magisterial district judge or municipal court, or a judgment at law or in equity was imposed by a court of common pleas. However, no denial shall be permitted on the basis of a property for which the judgment, order or decree is subject to a stay or supersedeas by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction or automatically allowed by statute or rule of court until the stay or supersedeas is lifted by the court or a higher court or the stay or supersedeas expires as otherwise provided by law. Where a stay or supersedeas is in effect, the property owner shall so advise the municipality seeking to deny a municipal permit[.]; or(iii) a delinquency in real property taxes or municipal charges, or an unabated serious violation of State law or a municipality code, and the real property is owned by a corporation or limited liability corporation COMPANY or a principal of a limited liability corporation COMPANY , incorporated inside or outside of this Commonwealth. (2) A municipality or board shall not deny a municipal permit to an applicant if the municipal permit is necessary to correct a violation of State law or a code.(3) The municipal permit denial shall not apply to an applicant's delinquency on taxes, water, sewer or refuse collection charges that are under appeal or otherwise contested through a court or administrative process.20250HB0316PN0982 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) In issuing a denial of a permit based on an applicant's delinquency in real property taxes or municipal charges or for failure to abate a serious violation of State law or a code on real property that the applicant owns in this Commonwealth, the municipality or board shall indicate the street address, municipal corporation and county in which the property is located and the court and docket number for each parcel cited as a basis for the denial. The denial shall also state that the applicant may request a letter of compliance from the appropriate State agency, municipality or school district, in a form specified by such entity as provided in this section.(5) A corporation or limited liability corporation COMPANY or a principal of a limited liability corporation COMPANY or their agent shall disclose in writing at the submission of an application any delinquencies in real property taxes or municipal charges or unabated serious violation of State law or a municipality code on any real property owned by the applicant within any municipality. Failure to disclose under this paragraph shall result in the imposition of a $1,000 fine payable to the municipality. * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0316PN0982 - 3 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223